Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB894.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Veterans Entering the Sustainability Sector Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Apprenticeship training." Workforce training that, upon satisfactory completion, results in the issuance of a registered apprentice certificate recognized by the department and that involves any of the following vocations, without limitation:1234567891011121314151617181920 (1) Electrician.(2) Construction craft laborer.(3) Machinist.(4) Sheet metal worker.(5) Carpenter.(6) Maintenance mechanic.(7) Welder.(8) Plumber.(9) Pipe fitter.(10) Automotive technician.(11) Industrial manufacturing technician.(12) Material coordinator."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible employer." An employer that:(1) Operates in the sustainability sector.(2) Devotes the majority of its financial resources to the development and operation of renewable energy as part of its business activities.(3) Hires a veteran with apprenticeship training."Environmental concerns." Includes any of the following that may adversely affect this Commonwealth and the residents of this Commonwealth:(1) Climate change.(2) The loss of biodiversity.(3) The loss of ecosystem services.(4) Land degradation.(5) Air pollution.(6) Water pollution.(7) Minimal renewable energy sources.20250HB0894PN0934 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Fund." The Veterans Entering the Sustainability Sector Fund established under section 8."Participating departments." The Department of Agriculture, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, the Department of Environmental Protection and the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs."Program." The Veterans Entering the Sustainability Sector Program established under section 3."Renewable energy." As follows:(1) Energy that comes from a source that:(i) Is natural.(ii) Is self-replenishing.(iii) Cannot be exhausted.(iv) Generally has a low-carbon or zero-carbon footprint.(2) The term includes:(i) Wind power.(ii) Solar power.(iii) Bioenergy and organic matter burned as fuel.(iv) Hydroelectric power, including tidal energy."Sustainability sector." Industries that address the impact of environmental concerns on the economy, society and the health, safety and general welfare of the public."Veteran." As defined in 51 Pa.C.S. § 7101.2 (relating to definitions)."VETSS grant." A Veterans Entering the Sustainability Sector grant awarded under the program.Section 3. Establishment of program.The Veterans Entering the Sustainability Sector Program is established within the department.20250HB0894PN0934 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Purposes of program.The purposes of the program are, through a partnership with the participating departments, to:(1) Provide veterans with apprenticeship training and the opportunity to enter the workforce in the sustainability sector.(2) Prioritize the hiring of veterans with apprenticeship training by any of the participating departments to address environmental concerns.(3) Provide VETSS grants to employers in the sustainability sector that hire veterans with apprenticeship training.Section 5. Workforce training.In consultation and coordination with the participating departments and with other organizations or business entities that provide or have the capacity to provide apprentice training, the department shall oversee the development and implementation of apprenticeship training for the purpose of awarding VETSS grants.Section 6. Grant applications.(a) Availability of grant.--An eligible employer may apply for a VETSS grant.(b) Public notice.--The department shall provide the following on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department:(1) Information regarding the availability and award of VETSS grants.(2) A form developed for eligible employers to use to apply for a VETSS grant.(c) Contents of application.--To qualify for a VETSS grant, 20250HB0894PN0934 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an eligible employer must complete a grant application form and provide the following information to the department:(1) The name, address and contact information of the eligible employer applying for the VETSS grant.(2) The name of the individual hired by the eligible employer, along with verification that the individual:(i) Is a veteran.(ii) Has satisfactorily completed, or is expected to satisfactorily complete, apprenticeship training.(3) Verification that the applicant is an eligible employer.(4) The amount of the VETSS grant requested.(5) Any other information that the department deems necessary and appropriate.(d) Application periods.--Beginning no later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall begin accepting and processing applications for VETSS grants. For all subsequent years, the department shall establish an application period during which applications for VETSS grants are accepted.Section 7. Award of VETSS grants.(a) Review.--After review of the information provided in an eligible employer's submitted application, the department shall determine whether to award a VETSS grant to the eligible employer and, if so, the amount of the grant awarded.(b) Time periods.--(1) The department shall approve or deny an application under the program no later than 60 days after the receipt of the completed application.(2) Subject to paragraph (3), if the department fails to 20250HB0894PN0934 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approve or deny an application under the program within 60 days after the receipt of the application, the application shall be deemed denied.(3) To aid in the determination of whether to award a VETSS grant, the department may require additional information or verification following receipt of the completed application. In such an instance, the time period specified in paragraph (1) shall commence upon receipt of the additional information or verification.(c) Notice.--(1) The department shall provide written notice to an eligible employer of the award or denial of the grant requested in the eligible employer's application.(2) Notice of the award of a VETSS grant shall include the amount of the grant awarded and any conditions or restrictions on the use of the grant.(3) Notice of the denial of all or part of a VETSS grant shall include the reasons for the full or partial denial.(d) Contract.--Before the disbursement of a VETSS grant, the eligible employer must enter into a contract with the department in which the eligible employer agrees that the veteran who is the employee of the eligible employer and whose hiring qualified the eligible employer for a VETSS grant shall remain employed by the eligible employer for at least two years following the disbursement of the VETSS grant. The following apply:(1) The contract shall be considered a contract with the Commonwealth.(2) The contract shall include the following terms:(i) If the veteran does not remain employed with the eligible employer for at least two years following 20250HB0894PN0934 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disbursement of the VETSS grant, the eligible employer shall be in breach of the contract and subject to the following penalties:(A) If the veteran was so employed for less than one year, the repayment of 100% of the VETSS grant.(B) If the veteran was so employed for at least one year but less than two years, the repayment of 50% of the VETSS grant.(C) Reasonable costs and attorney fees of a civil action regarding the breach of contract.(ii) If, after receiving a VETSS grant and during the two-year period described under subparagraph (i), an employer ceases to meet the requirements under paragraphs (1) and (2) of the definition of "eligible employer," the employer shall be subject to repayment of the entire amount of the VETSS grant.(iii) The eligible employer shall permit the department to determine compliance with the employment requirement and all other terms of the contract.(e) Limitations.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2):(i) VETSS grants shall be disbursed on a first-come, first-served basis determined by the department and until all money in the fund is exhausted.(ii) The department shall determine the amount of each VETSS grant based on the vocation of the veteran hired by the eligible employer.(2) The department may set a cap on the amount of a VETSS grant.(3) The department may set conditions or restrictions on 20250HB0894PN0934 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the use of a VETSS grant.(f) Duty of department.--The department shall implement any necessary policy or procedure to administer the program.Section 8. Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Veterans Entering the Sustainability Sector Fund is established as a nonlapsing fund in the State Treasury. Any money remaining in the fund, including interest, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain in the fund.(b) Fund sources.--(1) Funding for the program shall consist of appropriations by the General Assembly.(2) The department may solicit and accept alternative funding for the program, including Federal money, grants, donations, gifts and other payments from any source.(3) Money for the program shall be deposited into the fund.(c) Appropriation.--All money deposited into the fund and interest earned on the money in the fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to award grants under the program.Section 9. Reports.(a) Submittal.--No later than the March 1 that is at least one year after the effective date of this section and each March 1 thereafter, the department shall submit a report on the program to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The Secretary of Agriculture.(3) The Secretary of Conservation and Natural Resources.(4) The Secretary of Environmental Protection.20250HB0894PN0934 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The Secretary of Military and Veterans Affairs.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(8) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate.(9) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Contents.--Each annual report under this section shall include the following:(1) The number of applications received under the program.(2) The number of VETSS grants awarded.(3) The total amount of VETSS grants awarded.(4) The amount of each VETSS grant awarded by each vocation that was the subject of the apprentice training.(5) The number of VETSS grants denied, in whole or in part, along with the reasons for the denial.(6) A summary of any breaches of contract regarding the VETSS grants.(7) The involvement of the participating departments in developing and implementing the apprentice training.(8) The amount remaining in the fund.(9) Any recommendations by the department or the participating departments to improve the program.(c) Posting.--Each annual report under this section shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the 20250HB0894PN0934 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0894PN0934 - 10 - 123